Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.100

Executive hearings.

The governor may provide for hearings on all agency requests for expenditures to enable him or her to make determinations as to the need, value or usefulness of activities or programs requested by agencies. The governor may require the attendance of proper agency officials at his or her hearings and it shall be their duty to disclose such information as may be required to enable the governor to arrive at his or her final determination.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5165; 1965 c 8 s 43.88.100. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 10.]